Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-222.01
School lands; acquisition by certain companies; purposes.

Any manufacturing company, pipeline company, or telephone or telegraph company, incorporated or qualified to do business in this state, may acquire an easement or right-of-way for the purpose of constructing, replacing, and maintaining pipelines, power pumps, telephone and telegraph lines and appurtenances thereto, under and across any of the school lands, the title of which is vested in the State of Nebraska, as trustee for the common schools.

Laws 1953, c. 258, § 1, p. 867;

Laws 1957, c. 302, § 1, p. 1106;

Laws 1967, c. 466, § 2, p. 1445.